Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,200
Contract; void and unenforceable; definition.

(1) A surrogate parenthood contract entered into shall be void and unenforceable. The biological father of a child born pursuant to such a contract shall have all the rights and obligations imposed by law with respect to such child.

(2) For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, a surrogate parenthood contract shall mean a contract by which a woman is to be compensated for bearing a child of a man who is not her husband.

Laws 1988, LB 674, § 1.